Idaho statutes. Title 51 NOTARIES PUBLIC AND COMMISSIONERS OF DEEDS
Chapter 1 REVISED UNIFORM LAW ON NOTARIAL ACTS (2018)
§ 51-127. Rules.

The secretary of state may adopt rules to implement this chapter. Rules adopted regarding the performance of notarial acts with respect to electronic records may not require, or accord greater legal status or effect to, the implementation or application of a specific technology or technical specification. The rules may include but are not limited to the following:

Prescribing the manner of performing notarial acts regarding tangible and electronic records;

Including provisions to ensure that any change to or tampering with a record bearing a certificate of a notarial act is self-evident;

Including provisions to ensure integrity in the creation, transmittal, storage or authentication of electronic records or signatures;

Prescribing the process of granting, renewing, conditioning, denying, suspending or revoking a notary public commission and assuring the trustworthiness of an individual holding a commission as notary public;

Including provisions to prevent fraud or mistake in the performance of notarial acts;

Establishing the process for approving and accepting surety bonds and other forms of assurance under section 51-121, Idaho Code; and

Providing for the course of study under section 51-122, Idaho Code.

In adopting, amending or repealing rules about notarial acts with respect to electronic records, the secretary of state may consider, as far as is consistent with the provisions of this chapter:

The most recent standards regarding electronic records promulgated by national bodies, such as the national association of secretaries of state;

Standards, practices and customs of other jurisdictions that substantially enact this chapter; and

The views of governmental officials and entities and other interested persons.

§ 51-128. Notary public commission in effect.

A commission as a notary public in effect on the effective date of this act continues until its date of expiration. A notary public who applies to renew a commission as a notary public on or after the effective date of this act is subject to and shall comply with the provisions of this chapter. A notary public, in performing notarial acts after the effective date of this act, shall comply with the provisions of this chapter.

§ 51-129. Savings clause.

This chapter does not affect the validity or effect of a notarial act performed before the effective date of this act.

§ 51-130. Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing this uniform act, consideration must be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

§ 51-131. Relation to electronic signatures in global and national commerce act.

This chapter modifies, limits or supersedes the electronic signatures in global and national commerce act, 15 U.S.C. 7001 et seq., but does not modify, limit or supersede section 101(c) of that act, 15 U.S.C. 7001(c), or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in section 103(b) of that act, 15 U.S.C. 7003(b).

§ 51-132. Filing fees.

The fee for filing an application for appointment as a notary public shall be thirty dollars ($30.00).

The fee for filing an application for electronic notarization authorization shall be twenty dollars ($20.00).

There shall be no fee charged for filing a letter of resignation, a certified copy of a judgment of conviction, a certified copy of findings of fact or extract therefrom, public record of proof of material misstatement of fact in an application, certified copy of an order adjudging incompetency, or notice of death.

The fee for filing notice of change of name or address shall be five dollars ($5.00).

The fee for filing notice of cancellation of a notary bond shall be five dollars ($5.00).

The fee for a notary public database extraction shall be twenty-five dollars ($25.00).

The fee for a certified copy of a notary public record shall be ten dollars ($10.00) plus twenty-five cents (25¢) per page.

§ 51-133. Notary fee.

A notary public may, for any notarial act, charge a fee not to exceed five dollars ($5.00).

In addition to the fee, a notary public may be compensated for actual and reasonable expense of travel to a place where the notarial act is to be performed.

An employer shall not require a notary public in his employment to surrender a fee, if charged, or any part thereof to the employer. An employer may, however, preclude such notary public from charging a fee for a notarial act performed in the scope of the notary public’s employment.